Arkansas, session 2025, HB1949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-801(b), concerning the policy and
definitions related to the procurement of professional services, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) It is the policy of the State of Arkansas and its political
subdivisions that political subdivisions shall follow the procedures stated
in this section, except that competitive bidding shall not be used for the
procurement of legal, medical, emergency medical, ambulance, financial
advisory, architectural, engineering, construction management, and land
surveying professional consultant services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-11-802(c)(1), concerning the annual
statements of qualifications and performance data and restrictions on
competitive bidding in relation to the procurement of professional services,
*JLL209*
03/31/2025 2:05:37 PM JLL209

HB1949
is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The political subdivision shall not use competitive bidding for
the procurement of legal, medical, emergency medical, ambulance, financial
advisory, architectural, engineering, construction management, and land
surveying professional consulting services.































03/31/2025 2:05:37 PM JLL209